Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 52
GROUND WATER DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 42-5201. Short title — Title of districts — Definitions.

This chapter is known as the “Ground Water District Act”; the districts created hereunder may be termed “ground water districts.” When used in this chapter, and unless otherwise specified, the following terms shall be defined as follows:

“Board” means the board of directors of a ground water district organized pursuant to this chapter.

“Corporation” means a corporation or limited liability company.

“County commission” means the board of county commissioners or any other governing board or authority for a county, as provided by law.

“Department” means the Idaho department of water resources.

“Director” means the director of the department of water resources.

“District” means a ground water district established, or to be established, pursuant to this chapter.

“Ground water” when used in this chapter means water under the surface of the ground whatever may be the geologic structure in which it is standing or moving, as provided in section 42-230(a), Idaho Code.

“Ground water user” means the legal or beneficial owner of a ground water right, or the user of a ground water right pursuant to lease or contract of a ground water right to divert ground water of the state for a beneficial use or purpose, except for those diverting under rights used solely for domestic or stock use as defined by sections 42-111 and 42-1401A, Idaho Code, and provided, that for purposes of this chapter, the term ground water user shall not include any ground water right held by or on behalf of an Indian tribe or by tribal members for diversion and use within an Indian reservation, ground water rights held by the United States or ground water rights held by the state of Idaho. A ground water user is within the boundary of a ground water district if the well or other point of diversion used by that ground water user is within the boundary. A husband and wife together diverting ground water pursuant to right shall constitute one (1) ground water user. Ground water user includes both a ground water irrigator and a nonirrigator as defined in this chapter.

“Ground water irrigator” means a ground water user holding a ground water right for irrigation purposes within a ground water district.

“Land” or “lands,” when used in the context of the property of a ground water user subject to district assessment under this chapter, means the real property where ground water is diverted or placed to beneficial use, including the facilities in or through which a ground water user makes beneficial use of ground waters.

“Nonirrigator” means a ground water user holding a ground water right for commercial, municipal, or industrial purposes within a ground water district. A ground water user will be deemed a nonirrigator for purposes of this chapter even though: (a) some component of the user’s ground water use is for irrigation; or (b) the user holds a ground water right for irrigation that is incidental to, or normally associated with, the user’s commercial, municipal or industrial purpose.

“Member” means a ground water user whose lands, facilities and/or water rights are included in and subject to a ground water district and its policies.

“Mitigation plan” means a plan to prevent or compensate for material injury to holders of senior water rights caused by the diversion and use of water by the holders of junior priority ground water rights who are participants in the mitigation plan.
(14) “Person” means an individual, partnership, trust, estate, association, corporation, municipal corporation, the state of Idaho and any of its agencies, the United States, an Indian tribe, a public corporation, or any other public or private entity.

(15) “Public corporation” means counties, city and counties, cities, school districts, municipal water districts, irrigation districts, recharge districts, water districts, park districts, subdistricts, and all other governmental agencies of this state, having the power of levying or providing for the levy of general or special taxes or special assessments, and any political subdivision of another state of the United States.

(16) “Water right” means the legal right to divert and beneficially use the public waters of the state of Idaho where such right is evidenced by a decree, a permit or a license issued by the department, a beneficial or constitutional use right evidenced by an adjudication claim or claim based on section 42-243, Idaho Code, or a right based on federal law.

§ 42-5202. Establishment of ground water districts.

Whenever fifty (50) or a majority, whichever is less, of the ground water users in a particular geographic area desire to organize a ground water district, they may propose the organization of a district and the election of its initial board of directors under this chapter.

§ 42-5203. Petition for organization — Map — Bond.

A petition shall be first presented to the county commission of the county in which the greatest proportion of cubic feet per second of ground water rights of the proposed district is situated, which petition shall:

Be signed by the required number of ground water users in such proposed district;

State that the petitioners desire to have their lands included within and subject to the assessments of the district for purposes consistent with this chapter;

Set forth and describe by township, range and section, with the degree of certainty required by law in a tax roll, the boundary of the area where, if a ground water user is located within that boundary, that ground water user would be included in a ground water district, and shall request that the area described be organized into a ground water district;

Propose a name for the district;

Be accompanied by a list, identifying the ground water users within such proposed district by name, address, ground water right number, point of diversion, and cubic feet per second per ground water right, certified by the director of the department of water resources as accurately reflecting the records of the department;

Be accompanied by a map which shall indicate the proposed boundaries of the district, and which may propose division boundaries as specified in section 42-5208, Idaho Code;

Propose between three (3) and seven (7) divisions and division boundaries;

Include nominations for a director for each division, each of which shall be signed by not less than six (6) ground water users in the proposed district;

Be accompanied by bond, to be approved by the county commission, in double the amount of the probable cost to the county and the department of organizing such district, conditioned that the bondsmen will pay all said costs, in case organization of the district is unsuccessful.

The petition, together with all maps and papers filed therewith, shall, during the county’s office hours, be open to public inspection at the office of the county clerk between the date of filing and the date of the final hearing thereon. The boundaries specified in the petition shall be proposed in such manner that the greatest distance between two (2) wells in the district shall be no more than thirty (30) miles unless good cause is shown to the county commission for including a larger area.

Lands of ground water users do not have to be contiguous within a ground water district, and such district may be organized even though its boundaries may overlap with other districts formed pursuant to title 43, Idaho Code, or other titles of the Idaho Code.

If the district is organized, the costs of organization shall be assessed against the members of the district.

§ 42-5204. Notice of presentation to county commission.

The petition may be filed with the county clerk, upon verifying with the county assessment roll or other evidence of entitlement whether the petition is valid, at any time, and upon such filing the clerk forthwith shall cause a notice to be published in a newspaper printed within the county (counties) within the boundaries specified in the petition, or if no newspaper is printed in any of the affected counties, then in newspapers of general circulation in the affected county (counties). The notice shall state that (giving the first name on the petition) and others have filed a petition for the organization of a ground water district. The notice shall state the numbers of the townships, ranges, and sections where, if a ground water user is within those townships, ranges, and sections, that ground water user would be within the proposed district. The notice shall further state the time at which such petition will be presented to the county commission, which time shall be during a regular meeting of the commission or a special meeting called for that purpose, and the notice shall be published at least once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks before the day on which the petition is to be presented.

§ 42-5205. Notice of county commission hearing.

When the petition is presented, the county commission shall set a time for a hearing on the petition, which shall not be less than four (4) nor more than eight (8) weeks from the date of presentation, unless extended by the county commission for good cause. A notice of the time of such hearing shall be published by the county clerk, at the direction of the commission, at least three (3) weeks before the time of such hearing, in a newspaper or newspapers as required in section 42-5204, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5206. Examination by department of water resources — Report to county commission — Amendment of plan.

A copy of the petition and all maps and other papers filed with the county commission shall be filed with the department on the same day the petition is filed with the county commission.

The department shall examine the petition, maps and other papers submitted in support of it, and, taking into account hydrological factors, patterns of ground water use, or other attributes of the area that may aid the county commission, prepare a report upon the boundaries proposed for the district and submit the report to the county commission at least two (2) weeks before the meeting set for the commission to hear the petition.

§ 42-5207. Organization hearing before county commission — Order of county commission.

After receiving the report of the department of water resources, the county commission shall conduct a hearing on the petition. If the county commission determines that the requisite number of signatures were not gathered on the petition, the board shall adjourn the hearings for two (2) weeks for the purpose of enabling the petitioners to gather additional signatures. The petitioners may amend the boundaries of the proposed district at the hearing to include or exclude lands of those ground water irrigators who provide written notice or who appear at the hearing requesting that their lands be either included or excluded, to meet the recommendations of the department, or as they may find advisable to achieve suitable district boundaries. The county commission shall accept any additional nominations of persons to be directors at the hearing or the nominations may be filed with the county clerk. The nominations must be signed by at least six (6) ground water users from the proposed district.

When the county commission has determined to proceed with the petition, it may adjourn the hearing from time to time, not exceeding four (4) weeks in all, and on final hearing, the county commission:

May make such other changes in the proposed boundaries of the district and divisions within the district as it may find proper; and

Shall make an order on its records describing the area which it shall have determined to include in the district, and stating that lands of ground water users within such area will be organized into a ground water district if the vote of the electors accepts organization of the district.

The county commission shall notify the department of the final action by mailing or faxing a copy of the order to the department within seven (7) days of the board’s decision. If the boundaries of the proposed ground water district differ from the boundaries contained in the department’s original report, the department shall prepare a revised list of the ground water users within such proposed district by name, address, ground water right number, point of diversion, and cubic feet per second per ground water right and return it to the county commission.

§ 42-5208. Divisions of district for election of directors.

The county commission shall also make an order dividing the district into not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) divisions, each division to contain approximately the same amount, measured in cubic feet per second, of ground water rights as each other division. The divisions shall be numbered first, second, third, etc., and one (1) director, who shall be a ground water user in the division, shall be elected from each division of the district at large. The number of divisions into which the district shall be divided shall be specified in the petition for the organization of the district, and if not otherwise specified shall be three (3).

§ 42-5209. Notice of election. — The county commission shall give notice of an election to be held in accordance with section 34-106, Idaho Code, in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be organized under this chapter, and, if so, who shall be its initial directors. The notice shall describe the area, with the certainty required in an ordinary deed, where, if a ground water user is located within that area, that ground water user would be included in the district and shall state the name of the proposed district as designated by the commission, and shall state that a map showing the area of the district is on file in the office of the county clerk, which map, if not previously made, shall be made by the petitioners after the determination of the commissioners of the boundary of the proposed district, and shall state the names of those individuals who have been nominated for director’s positions. The notice shall be published for four (4) weeks prior to such election, in a newspaper or newspapers as required in section 42-5204, Idaho Code. The notice shall require the electors to cast ballots which shall contain the words “ground water district—yes,” or “ground water district

no,” and also to cast ballots for at least one (1) person from each division for director of the district.

§ 42-5210. Qualifications of voters for district elections.

Any ground water irrigator, and any nonirrigator who is a member for all purposes, within the proposed district shall be entitled to vote at any election held under the provisions of this chapter. The production of documentation of a water right as described in section 42-5201(16), Idaho Code, shall be sufficient evidence of ground water use for purposes of acting as an elector under this chapter. A representative of a ground water user shall be so designated by written proxy signed by the ground water user except that the vote of a state, city or county government may be cast by an elected or appointed official of the agency, or his designee. A corporation or partnership shall vote or otherwise act by a single individual who is authorized by the corporation or partnership to act on its behalf. A corporation or partnership must furnish the election officials a written designation stating the name of the individual who is authorized to vote and otherwise act for the corporation or partnership.

Any ground water user who becomes a member of a district solely for mitigation purposes:

Shall be entitled to vote only in those district elections concerning whether to incur indebtedness as specified in section 42-5234, Idaho Code; and

Shall be ineligible to nominate directors or officers of the district, to serve in such capacities, or otherwise to participate in the governance of the district.

A nonirrigator may participate in the election to determine whether a district will be formed only according to the following provisions:

The nonirrigator shall notify the judges of election in writing at least ten (10) working days prior to the date of the election that such person supports the formation of the district, elects to become either a member for all purposes, or a member only for mitigation purposes as described in section 42-5214, Idaho Code, should it be formed, and, by such notice, casts its vote(s) in favor of formation.

The notification shall contain a legal description of the land through which the nonirrigator places ground waters to beneficial use, a statement of the amount of such person’s ground water right in cubic feet per second of diversions, and a copy of the ground water right documentation described in section 42-5201(16), Idaho Code.

Once the judges of election have accepted the notification described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, they shall duly record the nonirrigator’s vote(s) in favor of district formation in the canvassing of votes carried out pursuant to section 42-5213, Idaho Code.

If the voting results in the formation of the district, the nonirrigator who provided such notification thereafter shall be a full member or member for mitigation purposes of such district, whichever the case may be, and shall have all obligations, rights, and limitations attaching thereto.

§ 42-5211. Conduct of elections.

Elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general laws of the state; provided, no particular form of ballot shall be required, and that the provisions of the election laws as to the form and distribution of ballots shall not apply.

The county commission shall establish one (1) or more election precincts, not exceeding seven (7), as may be necessary, and define the boundaries thereof, which boundaries, when the district is divided into precincts, shall be the same as the division boundaries above-provided for and which said precincts may thereafter be changed by the board of directors of such district as may be necessary; provided, that districts shall have not less than three (3), nor more than seven (7) voting precincts.

The county commission shall also appoint three (3) judges of election for each such election precinct, who shall perform the same duties as near as may be as judges of election, under the general laws of the state.

§ 42-5212. Registration not required.

No registration shall be required in any ground water district election, but in lieu thereof the judges of election shall require every elector to subscribe to an elector’s oath as prerequisite to casting his vote, and such oath shall be the usual elector’s oath with the following words added thereto, “I am a resident of . . . . . . . . . . county, and I am a ground water user within the . . . . . . . (proposed) ground water district, or I am a representative of a ground water user within the . . . . . . . (proposed) ground water district” and present evidence of such ground water use pursuant to section 42-5201(16), Idaho Code, if they do not appear on the department’s list as provided in section 42-5206, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5213. Canvass of votes — Completion of organization. — (1) Immediately after any election for voting upon the organization of a ground water district, the judges of the election shall forward the official results of said election to the county clerk. The county commission shall meet within ten (10) days after the election returns are received, and canvass the votes cast. If it appears that two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast are “ground water district

yes,” the commission shall, by order entered on its minutes, declare such territory duly organized as a ground water district, under the name designated, shall declare that a map showing the area of the district is on file in the office of the county clerk and shall declare the persons receiving respectively the highest number of votes for director from each division to be duly elected as directors. The county commission shall cause a copy of such order, duly certified, to be immediately filed for record in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any portion of such district is situated, and shall mail a certified copy of the order to the director.

(2) If it shall appear, however, that more than one-third (1/3) of the votes cast are “ground water district—no,” then a record of that fact shall be duly entered upon the minutes of the board, and all proceedings in regard to the organization of the district shall be void, and the expenses properly incurred thereunder may be collected on the bond provided for in section 42-5203, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5214. Ground water users included within the district — Notice and hearing for members included in district after March 31, 2005 — Order — Appeal and conclusiveness.

All ground water irrigators within the boundaries of the district shall be members of the district and subject to assessments, rights and responsibilities established by the district as set forth in this chapter, notwithstanding any change in the ownership or control of the property of the water user, whether by way of transfer, exchange, conveyance, assignment, lease, or otherwise, to which the water right or rights used to determine assessments are appurtenant, unless excluded from the district pursuant to sections 42-5251 through 42-5257, Idaho Code. Except as provided in section 42-5276, Idaho Code, any ground water irrigator who previously was not a member as of March 31, 2005, shall be included as a member effective upon order of the board finding and confirming that inclusion of such ground water irrigator is in the best interests of the district and that such ground water irrigator shall receive benefits from such inclusion as a member. Such order may be made only after the board shall have caused a notice of such hearing to be published in the manner of notices of elections, which notice shall state that all persons interested in or that may be affected by such inclusion as a member shall appear at the time and place named in the notice and show cause in writing why they should not be included as a member. The board, at the time mentioned in said notice shall hear any objections to inclusion. The failure of any person to file with the district office an objection to inclusion as a member prior to the noticed hearing shall be taken as an assent on his part to such inclusion as a member of the district. Any order confirming the inclusion of ground water irrigators as members of the district shall be certified by the board president and secretary and filed for record in the recorder’s office of each county within which are situated any lands of the district and notice of the order shall be published in the manner of notices of elections. Any person who properly has filed an objection to inclusion as a member shall have the right to appeal to the district court of the county in which such person’s ground water right is situated, provided such appeal shall be made within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the order confirming such inclusion. After said thirty (30) day appeal period, no one shall have any cause or right of action to contest the legality, formality or regularity of said order of inclusion for any reason whatsoever, and thereafter, said inclusion and the constitution and validity of the district shall be considered valid and incontestable without limitation. Any ground water irrigator who previously was not a member of the district as of March 31, 2005, that is included as a member upon order of the board shall be liable for his proportionate share of all costs of the district incurred after such date, including his proportionate share of all bonded, warrant or other indebtedness incurred prior to March 31, 2005, but only the proportionate share of such prior indebtedness applicable to the period after March 31, 2005.

All nonirrigators within the boundaries of the district who voted according to notice as provided in section 42-5210(3), Idaho Code, are members of the district as specified in such notice.

A nonirrigator also may become a member of a district by providing, within sixty (60) days after the date on which the district is formed, written notice to the district board that the nonirrigator wishes to join the district either as a member for all purposes or as a member for mitigation purposes only. Upon providing such notice, the nonirrigator shall be either a member for all purposes or a member for mitigation purposes only, as specified in the notice, and shall be subject to assessment accordingly as provided in this chapter. After such sixty (60) day period, a nonirrigator may become a member of a district only through the annexation procedure described in sections 42-5245 through 42-5249, Idaho Code.

Except as provided for nonirrigators as defined in subsection (11) of section 42-5201, Idaho Code, any person whose permit, license, or other entitlement to appropriate ground water was acquired after the formation of the district, or who appropriates ground water for uses not requiring a permit after the formation of the district, but qualifies as a ground water user under subsection (8) of section 42-5201, Idaho Code, within the area of the district in all other respects, shall be deemed included within and subject to assessment by the district, if benefitted either directly or indirectly by the district as of the date the permit, license, or entitlement is acquired.

§ 42-5215. Limitation on proceedings affecting validity.

No action shall be commenced or maintained, or defense made affecting the validity or organization of the district, more than two (2) years from and after the county commission enters on its minutes the order directing the formation of the district.

§ 42-5216. Organizational meeting of board.

From and after the date the county commission files its order declaring the district to be formed by election, the organization of the district shall be complete and those ground water users specified in section 42-5214, Idaho Code, shall be included within the district. The officers and directors of the district shall be entitled to enter immediately upon the duties of their respective offices, upon qualifying according to law, and shall hold such offices respectively, until their successors are elected and qualified. The board of directors so elected shall meet within thirty (30) days after their election and elect a chairman, and appoint a secretary and treasurer, who shall perform the duties imposed upon such officers under this chapter.

§ 42-5217. Treasurer’s official bonds.

The treasurer shall on his appointment execute and file with the secretary an official bond in such amount as may be fixed by the district board of directors, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000); and shall thereafter from time to time execute and file such further bonds as may be required by the board in amounts fixed by it, which amounts shall be of at least fifty percent (50%) of the maximum probable amount of money in the treasurer’s hands at any one (1) time. All such official bonds shall be executed by a lawfully qualified surety company.

§ 42-5218. Election, term of office, nominations and qualifications.

One (1) year following the organization of the district, an election shall be held in accordance with section 34-106(1), Idaho Code, at which shall be elected one (1) director for each division of the district by the electors of the district at large. Following the election, the term of office of the directors shall be selected by lot so that as nearly as may be, one-third (1/3) of the number shall hold office for the term of one (1) year, one-third (1/3) for the term of two (2) years, and the balance for the term of three (3) years. An election shall be held in the district in accordance with section 34-106(1), Idaho Code, for each year thereafter, at which directors shall be elected to succeed those whose terms expire, to hold office for a term of three (3) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. Every director must be a ground water user and a member of the district in the division of the director whom he is to succeed in office. Written nominations for the office of director must be signed by at least six (6) members in districts having less than one hundred (100) members and by at least twelve (12) members in districts having more than one hundred (100) members, and filed with the secretary of the district not less than twenty-eight (28) days nor more than forty-two (42) days before the date of election; and the names of the persons so nominated shall be placed upon official ballot to be furnished by the district.

The board of directors may provide that any elections conducted under this chapter may be conducted by mail as long as the ballots are mailed not later than fourteen (14) days prior to the election and received by the secretary of the district by 8:00 p.m. on the date of the election.

§ 42-5218A. When election not required.

In any election for directors if, after the expiration of the date for filing written nominations for the office of director, it appears that only one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated thereby for each position to be filled, it shall not be necessary to hold an election, and the board of directors shall, within five (5) days after expiration of the date for filing written nominations, declare such candidate elected as director. The procedure set forth in this section shall not apply to any other district election.

§ 42-5218B. Notice of election.

The secretary of the district shall give notice of all elections in the district by posting the same in five (5) public places in each county in which a part of the district is situated and in the office of the board of directors at least four (4) weeks before the day of such election, or by publication of the notice once a week for four (4) successive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers published in each of said counties or in a newspaper of general circulation therein. Notices shall state the time of the election and the location of polling places within the district and the directors to be elected or other question to be voted upon, as the case may be.

§ 42-5218C. Conduct of elections.

The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general laws of the state; provided that no particular form of ballot shall be required and the provisions of the election laws as to the form and distribution of ballots shall not apply and each ballot must indicate the number of cubic feet per second associated with the ballot cast. The board of directors shall designate polling places in such number as it may deem necessary. At least ten (10) days before the holding of any election, the board shall appoint three (3) electors to serve as judges of election at each polling place. The judges shall perform the same duties as near as may be, as judges of election under the general laws of the state. Immediately after the election, the judges of election shall forward the official results to the secretary of the district.

§ 42-5218D. Canvass of returns — Declaration of winners.

On the first Monday after each election, or at a time designated by the board of directors, the board shall meet at its usual place of meeting and proceed to canvass the returns. By order entered on its minutes, the board shall declare elected the person or persons having the highest number of votes for each office.

§ 42-5219. Directors at large.

In the event a district is divided into six (6) or fewer divisions, the district is authorized to elect one (1) to two (2) directors at large. Directors at large shall be elected at the annual meeting of the district by a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the members present at the meeting. Every director at large elected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be a ground water user in the district. Directors at large shall hold office for a term of two (2) years, or until their successors are elected and qualified. Provided however, that in no event shall a district have more than a total of seven (7) directors serving at any time whether elected pursuant to the provisions of section 42-5218, Idaho Code, or pursuant to this section.

§ 42-5220 — 42-5222. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 42-5223. Board of directors — Officers — Meetings — Compensation — Vacancies.

The board of directors annually shall elect a chairman from their number and shall appoint a secretary and a treasurer to hold office at the pleasure of the board. Upon appointment the treasurer shall execute and file with the secretary an official bond in such amount as may be fixed by the board of directors, and shall thereafter from time to time execute and file such further bonds as may be required by the board in amounts fixed by it, which amounts shall be at least fifty percent (50%) of the maximum probable amount of money in the treasurer’s hands at any one (1) time. All such official bonds shall be executed by a lawfully qualified surety company.

The board of directors shall designate an office of the district.

The board of directors shall hold a regular monthly meeting in the district’s office on the first Tuesday in every month or such date each month as it shall fix by resolution, and such special meetings as may be required for the proper transaction of business. Special meetings may be held on seventy-two (72) hours’ notice of the chairman or a majority of the members. A majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and the concurrence of a majority of the members shall be necessary to constitute the action of the board. All meetings of the board shall be public and all records of the board shall be open to the inspection of any member water user, or representative thereof during business hours.

The members of the board of directors shall fix the compensation board members shall receive for each day spent attending the meetings, or while engaged in official business under the order of the board, together with actual and necessary expenses. The term “actual and necessary expenses” shall include all traveling and lodging expenses necessarily incurred by any director when absent from his residence in the performance of the duties of his office. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the other officers of the district.

In case of a vacancy in the office of director occurring otherwise than by the expiration of a term, the remaining members of the board of directors shall fill such vacancy by appointing a ground water user who is a member of the district or a representative thereof, possessing full voting qualifications under this chapter and the qualifications of the director whose office has become vacant to serve the remainder of the term.